Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
SPECIAL REGISTRATION OF HORSELESS
CARRIAGES AND ORIGINAL PLATES

42-12-301. Special registration of horseless carriages - rules.

The department may specially register and issue a horseless carriage special license plate for motor vehicles valued principally because of the vehicles' early date of manufacture, design, or historical interest or valued as collector's items.

For the purposes of this section, "early date of manufacture" means that a motor vehicle was manufactured at least fifty years before the current date of registration.

The plates issued under subsection (1) of this section must be of a design, determined by the director, that is different from that used by the state for regular motor vehicle registration.

The director shall register the vehicles and issue plates for a period not exceeding five years, but all the registrations and plates shall expire on the same date regardless of the date of issue.

Upon the expiration of the five-year period ending with the year 1959, and each five years thereafter, the registration plate originally issued for each vehicle must remain with the vehicle. The director shall issue a tab to be securely fastened to the plate showing the five years for which the motor vehicle is registered.

A person who has registered a vehicle under this section shall renew the registration within thirty days prior to its expiration date. If the application for renewal, together with the fees, is not received by the director prior to the expiration date, the director shall notify the registered owner, at the owner's last-known address, by regular mail, to reregister the vehicle or surrender the registration plate within ten days after the expiration date of the registration. If the notice is not complied with, the director shall secure the return of the plate.

The fee for issuing such registration and special registration plate or tab is five dollars for each five-year period or fraction thereof. In addition to the five-dollar registration fee, the director shall collect the one-dollar-and-fifty-cent annual specific ownership fee provided by law for each year of registration, which additional fee shall be collected for the number of years remaining at the time of registration and issuance or renewal of the registration.

A person may drive a motor vehicle with the special registration plates authorized by this section or section 42-12-302 on the streets and highways, but only:

To and from assemblies, conventions, or other meetings where such vehicles and their ownership are the primary interest;

On special occasions, for demonstrations and parades;

On occasions when the operation of the vehicle on the streets and highways will not constitute a traffic hazard; and

To, from, and during local, state, or national tours held primarily for the exhibition and enjoyment of such vehicles.

Upon the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle bearing a special registration plate, the plate remains with the vehicle and is transferred to the new owner. The new owner shall title such motor vehicle as provided by law and give notice of the transfer of ownership to the department.

Applications for special registration of motor vehicles are made directly to the department. The department shall administer all matters concerning such registration. The department shall transfer fees received from special registrations to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fees to the highway users tax fund.

The director may prepare any special forms and issue any rules necessary to implement this section.

When the director receives an application for a title to a vehicle under subsection (1) of this section, the director shall accept the original motor or serial number on the vehicle and shall not require or issue a special identification number for the vehicle.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 237, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3)(c) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 373, § 26, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-219 as it existed prior to 2011.

42-12-302. Original plates.

In addition to any other registration, the department may approve use of the style of original plates from the vehicle's year of manufacture for motor vehicles valued principally because of the vehicles' early date of manufacture, design, or historical interest or valued as collector's items. Original plates must meet the following criteria in order to qualify for use under this section:

The plates were made at least thirty years prior to registration under this section;

The plates are embossed with the year of original issue;

The plates are legible;

The plates were issued contemporaneously with the year of manufacture of the vehicle upon which they are displayed, as determined by the department; and

The plates do not exceed seven characters.

A person shall not drive the vehicle bearing the original plates except as authorized in section 42-12-301 (5).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 239, § 1, effective August 10.